Utah statutes.
63G-6a-605.   Correction or withdrawal of bids -- Cancellation of award.

(1)  Correction or withdrawal of inadvertently erroneous bids, or the cancellation of an award or a contract that is based on an unintentionally erroneous bid, may be made in accordance with the rules of the applicable rulemaking authority.

(2)  Notwithstanding Subsection (1), the following changes may not be made to a bid after the bid opening:

(a)  changes in bid pricing;

(b)  changes in the cost evaluation formula; or

(c)  changes in other provisions that are prejudicial to fair competition or to the interest of the procurement unit.

(3)  A decision to permit the correction or withdrawal of a bid or the cancellation of an award or a contract under Subsection (1) shall be supported in a written document, signed by the chief procurement officer, the procurement officer, or the head of the procurement unit with independent procurement authority.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

